Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2620.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5967HV (1) 91 th/ns H.F. 2620 Section 1. Section 321P.5, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 1A. a. A local authority that does not 3 hold a valid permit to use an automated or remote system for 4 traffic law enforcement, as required in section 321P.2, shall 5 not erect or post a sign giving notice that a system is used. 6 b. The department shall assess a civil penalty of one 7 thousand dollars against a local authority for a violation of 8 paragraph âaâ . In the case of a continuing violation, each day 9 of the continuing violation is a separate violation. Moneys 10 collected in civil penalties under this paragraph shall be 11 deposited in the road use tax fund. 12